Illinois, session 104th, HB4069.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Supreme Court Ethics Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Section:7    "Benefits" means honoraria, reimbursement of expenses, and 8waivers of fees.9    "Covered person" means the Supreme Court Judge and the 10Supreme Court Judge's spouse, the Supreme Court Judge's 11domestic partner, and the Supreme Court Judge's children.12    "De minimis", in the context of interests pertaining to 13disqualification of a Supreme Court Judge, means an 14insignificant interest that could not raise a reasonable 15question regarding the Supreme Court Judge's impartiality.16    "Domestic partner" means a person with whom another person 17maintains a household and an intimate relationship, other than 18a person's legal spouse.19    "Economic interest" means ownership of more than a de 20minimis legal or equitable interest. Except for situations in 21which the Supreme Court Judge participates in the management 22of such a legal or equitable interest or the interest could be 23substantially affected by the outcome of a proceeding before a   HB4069- 2 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1Supreme Court Judge, "economic interest" does not include (1) 2an interest in the individual holdings within a mutual or 3common investment fund; (2) an interest in securities held by 4an educational, religious, charitable, fraternal, or civic 5organization in which the Supreme Court Judge or the Supreme 6Court Judge's spouse, domestic partner, parent, or child 7serves as a director, an officer, an advisor, or other 8participant; (3) a deposit in a financial institution or 9deposits or proprietary interests the Supreme Court Judge may 10maintain as a member of a mutual savings association or credit 11union or similar proprietary interests; or (4) an interest in 12the issuer of government securities held by the Supreme Court 13Judge.14    "Fiduciary" includes relationships such as executor, 15administrator, trustee, or guardian.16    "Impartial", "impartiality", and "impartially" mean 17absence of bias or prejudice in favor of, or against, 18particular parties or classes of parties, as well as 19maintenance of an open mind in considering issues that may 20come before a Supreme Court Judge.21    "Income" means dividends, interest, rent, royalties, or 22distributions.23    "Independence" means a Supreme Court Judge's freedom from 24influence or controls other than those established by law.25    "Integrity" means probity, fairness, honesty, uprightness, 26and soundness of character.  HB4069- 3 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1    "Knowingly", "knowledge", "known", and "knows" mean actual 2knowledge of the fact in question. A person's knowledge may be 3inferred from the circumstances.4    "Member of a Supreme Court Judge's family residing in the 5Supreme Court Judge's household" means any relative of a 6Supreme Court Judge by blood or marriage, or a person treated 7by a Supreme Court Judge as a member of the Supreme Court 8Judge's family, who resides in the Supreme Court Judge's 9household.10    "Ordinary social hospitality" includes the routine 11amenities, favors, and courtesies which are normally exchanged 12between friends and acquaintances, and which would not create 13an appearance of impropriety to a reasonable, objective 14observer. The touchstone of this objective test is a careful 15consideration of social custom. Factors relevant to this 16inquiry include (1) the monetary value of the gift, loan, 17bequest, or other item transferred from the donor or lender to 18the Supreme Court Judge; (2) the relationship between the 19Supreme Court Judge and the donor or lender; (3) the social 20practices and customs associated with transfers of the type 21made between the Supreme Court Judge and donor or lender; and 22(4) the circumstances of the transaction.23    "Record date" means December 31 of the year immediately 24preceding the date upon which the statement of economic 25interests must be filed under this Act.26    "Retirement/investment accounts" means all assets valued   HB4069- 4 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1in excess of $1,000 in which any covered person has an 2ownership interest, including those assets owned in an 3Individual Retirement Account (IRA), 401(k) plan, 403(b) plan, 4457 plan, deferred compensation plan administered by the State 5of Illinois, 529 college savings plan, Illinois Uniform 6Transfers to Minors Act account, or similar account.7    "Supreme Court Judge" means a judge of the Illinois 8Supreme Court.9    "Third degree of relationship" includes the following 10persons: great-grandparent, grandparent, parent, uncle, aunt, 11brother, sister, child, grandchild, great-grandchild, nephew, 12and niece. 13    Section 10. Judicial disqualification.14    (a) A Supreme Court Judge shall disqualify himself or 15herself in any proceeding in which the Supreme Court Judge's 16impartiality might reasonably be questioned, including, but 17not limited to, the following circumstances: 18        (1) The Supreme Court Judge has a personal bias or 19    prejudice concerning a party or a party's lawyer or 20    personal knowledge of facts that are in dispute in the 21    proceeding. 22        (2) The Supreme Court Judge knows that the Supreme 23    Court Judge, the Supreme Court Judge's spouse or domestic 24    partner, a person within the third degree of relationship 25    to either of them, or the spouse or domestic partner of   HB4069- 5 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1    such a person is: 2            (A) a party to the proceeding or an officer, 3        director, general partner, managing member, or trustee 4        of a party; 5            (B) acting as a lawyer in the proceeding; 6            (C) a person who has more than a de minimis 7        interest that could be substantially affected by the 8        proceeding; or9            (D) likely to be a material witness in the 10        proceeding.11        (3) The Supreme Court Judge knowingly, individually, 12    or as a fiduciary or the Supreme Court Judge's spouse, 13    domestic partner, parent, or child, wherever residing, or 14    any other member of the Supreme Court Judge's family 15    residing in the Supreme Court Judge's household has an 16    economic interest in the subject matter in controversy or 17    is a party to the proceeding.18        (4) The Supreme Court Judge, while a Supreme Court 19    Judge or a judicial candidate, has made a public 20    statement, other than in a court proceeding, judicial 21    decision, or opinion that commits or appears to commit the 22    Supreme Court Judge to reach a particular result or rule 23    in a particular way in the proceeding or controversy.24        (5) The Supreme Court Judge:25            (A) served as a lawyer in the matter;26            (B) represented any party to the matter while   HB4069- 6 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1        engaged in the private practice of law within a period 2        of 7 years following the last date on which the Supreme 3        Court Judge represented the party;4            (C) within the preceding 3 years was associated in 5        the private practice of law with any law firm or lawyer 6        currently representing any party in the matter, 7        provided that referral of cases when no monetary 8        interest was retained shall not be deemed an 9        association within the meaning of this subparagraph; 10            (D) served in governmental employment and in such 11        capacity participated personally and substantially as 12        a lawyer or public official concerning the matter or 13        has publicly expressed in such capacity an opinion 14        concerning the merits of the particular matter;15            (E) was a material witness concerning the matter; 16        or17            (F) previously presided as a Supreme Court Judge 18        over the matter in another court.19        (6) During an election cycle, the Supreme Court Judge 20    and any political committee acting on behalf of the 21    Supreme Court Judge have accepted, from an individual or 22    political committee, contributions that, in the aggregate, 23    exceed the limitations on campaign contributions that may 24    be made to a political party committee by a political 25    action committee under Section 9-8.5 of the Election Code 26    as adjusted from time to time by the State Board of   HB4069- 7 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1    Elections under subsection (g) of that Section.2    When disqualifying himself or herself in a proceeding, the 3Supreme Court Judge shall state the reason for his or her 4recusal.5    (b) A Supreme Court Judge shall keep informed about the 6Supreme Court Judge's personal and fiduciary economic 7interests and make a reasonable effort to keep informed about 8the personal economic interests of the Supreme Court Judge's 9spouse or domestic partner and the Supreme Court Judge's 10children.11    (c) A Supreme Court Judge subject to disqualification 12under this Section, other than for bias or prejudice under 13paragraph (1) of subsection (a), may disclose on the record 14the basis of the Supreme Court Judge's disqualification and 15may ask the parties and their lawyers to consider, outside the 16presence of the Supreme Court Judge and court personnel, 17whether to waive disqualification. If, following the 18disclosure, the parties and lawyers agree, without 19participation by the Supreme Court Judge or court personnel, 20that the Supreme Court Judge should not be disqualified, the 21Supreme Court Judge may participate in the proceeding. The 22agreement shall be incorporated into the record of the 23proceeding.24    (d) Under this Section, a Supreme Court Judge is 25disqualified whenever the Supreme Court Judge's impartiality 26might reasonably be questioned, regardless of whether any of   HB4069- 8 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1the specific provisions of subsection (a) apply.2    (e) A Supreme Court Judge's obligation not to hear or 3decide matters in which disqualification is required applies 4regardless of whether a motion to disqualify is filed.5    (f) The rule of necessity may override the rule of 6disqualification. In matters that require immediate action, 7the Supreme Court Judge must disclose on the record the basis 8for possible disqualification.9    (g) The fact that a lawyer in a proceeding is affiliated 10with a law firm with which a relative of the Supreme Court 11Judge is affiliated does not itself disqualify the Supreme 12Court Judge. If, however, the Supreme Court Judge's 13impartiality might reasonably be questioned under subsection 14(a) or the relative is known by the Supreme Court Judge to have 15an interest in the law firm that could be substantially 16affected by the proceeding under subparagraph (C) of paragraph 17(2) of subsection (a), the Supreme Court Judge's 18disqualification is required.19    (h) A Supreme Court Judge shall disclose on the record 20information that the Supreme Court Judge believes the parties 21or their lawyers might reasonably consider relevant to a 22possible motion for disqualification, even if the Supreme 23Court Judge believes there is no basis for disqualification.24    (i) A Supreme Court Judge's use of social media or social 25networking platforms may create the appearance of a 26relationship between the Supreme Court Judge and litigants or   HB4069- 9 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1lawyers who may appear before the Supreme Court Judge. Whether 2a relationship would cause the Supreme Court Judge's 3impartiality to "reasonably be questioned" depends on the 4facts. While the labels used by the social media or social 5networking platform are not dispositive of the nature of the 6relationship, Supreme Court Judges shall consider the manner 7in which the rules on disqualification have been applied in 8traditional contexts and the additional ways in which social 9media or social networking platforms may amplify any 10connection to the Supreme Court Judge. 11    Section 15. Acceptance of gifts, loans, bequests, favors, 12benefits, or other things of value.13    (a) A covered person shall not accept any gifts, loans, 14bequests, benefits, favors, or other things of value, except 15as follows: 16        (1) any items or items from any one source during a 17    calendar year having a cumulative total value of less than 18    $100; 19        (2) gifts, loans, bequests, benefits, favors, or other 20    things of value from individuals whose relationship with 21    the covered person would require disqualification of the 22    Supreme Court Judge under Section 10;23        (3) ordinary social hospitality; 24        (4) commercial or financial opportunities and 25    benefits, including special pricing and discounts, and   HB4069- 10 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1    loans from lending institutions in their regular course of 2    business, if the same opportunities and benefits or loans 3    are made available on the same terms to similarly situated 4    persons who are not covered persons;5        (5) rewards and prizes given to competitors or 6    participants in random drawings, contests, or other events 7    that are open to persons who are not covered persons; 8        (6) scholarships, fellowships, and similar benefits or 9    awards, if they are available to similarly situated 10    persons who are not covered persons, based upon the same 11    terms and criteria; 12        (7) books, magazines, journals, audiovisual materials, 13    and other resource materials supplied by publishers on a 14    complimentary basis for official use; 15        (8) gifts incident to a public testimonial; 16        (9) invitations to a covered person or the guest of a 17    Supreme Court Judge to attend without charge: 18            (A) an event associated with a bar-related 19        function or other activity relating to the law, the 20        legal system, or the administration of justice; or 21            (B) an event associated with any of the Supreme 22        Court Judge's educational, religious, charitable, 23        fraternal, or civic activities permitted by the 24        Illinois Code of Judicial Conduct of 2023, if the same 25        invitation is offered to nonjudges who are engaged in 26        similar ways in the activity as is the Supreme Court   HB4069- 11 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1        Judge;2        (10) gifts, loans, bequests, benefits, favors, or 3    other things of value, only if the donor is not a party or 4    other person whose interests have come or are likely to 5    come before the Supreme Court Judge, including lawyers who 6    practice or have practiced before the Supreme Court Judge 7    or the cumulative total value of the gifts, loans, 8    bequests, benefits, favors, or other things of value is 9    less than $100 in a calendar year; and10        (11) gifts loans, bequests, benefits, favors, or other 11    things of value the acceptance of which is allowed under 12    subsection (c).13    (b) Whenever a covered person accepts a gift or other 14thing of value without paying fair market value, there is a 15risk that the benefit might be viewed as intended to influence 16the Supreme Court Judge's decision in a case. This Section 17prohibits the acceptance of benefits except in circumstances 18where the risk of improper influence is low. 19    (c) Gift giving between friends and relatives is a common 20occurrence and ordinarily does not create an appearance of 21impropriety or cause reasonable persons to believe that the 22Supreme Court Judge's independence, integrity, or impartiality 23has been compromised. In addition, when the appearance of 24friends or relatives in a case would require the Supreme Court 25Judge's disqualification under Section 10, there would be no 26opportunity for a gift to influence the Supreme Court Judge's   HB4069- 12 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1decision-making. Paragraph (2) of subsection (a) places no 2restrictions upon the ability of a covered person to accept 3gifts or other things of value from friends or relatives under 4these circumstances. 5    (d) Businesses and financial institutions frequently make 6available special pricing, discounts, and other benefits, 7either in connection with a temporary promotion or for 8preferred customers based upon longevity of the relationship, 9volume of business transacted, and other factors. A covered 10person may freely accept such benefits if they are available 11to the general public or if the covered person qualifies for 12the special price or discount according to the same criteria 13as are applied to persons who are not covered persons. 14    (e) This Section applies only to acceptance of gifts or 15other things of value by covered persons.16    (f) Contributions to a Supreme Court Judge's campaign for 17judicial office are governed by paragraph (6) of subsection 18(a) of Section 10 of this Act and the Illinois Code of Judicial 19Conduct of 2023. 20    (g) Disclosure of economic interests, including gifts, is 21governed by Sections 20 and 25. 22    Section 20. Reporting requirements.23    (a) A Supreme Court Judge shall file annually with the 24Clerk of the Illinois Supreme Court a verified written 25statement of economic interests on an Illinois Judicial   HB4069- 13 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1Statement of Economic Interests Form that is substantially 2similar to the form prescribed in Section 25.3    (b) The disclosure of economic interests under this 4Section is intended to (1) maintain and promote public 5confidence in the integrity, impartiality, fairness, and 6independence of the judiciary; (2) provide public information 7bearing on Supreme Court Judges' potential conflicts of 8interest; and (3) foster compliance with this Act and Illinois 9Supreme Court Rules. The statement of economic interests is 10designed to achieve an appropriate balance with respect to 11particular information that might reasonably bear on these 12objectives between the value of public disclosure of that 13information, on the one hand, and Supreme Court Judges' 14legitimate privacy interests, on the other hand.15    (c) The verified written statement of economic interests 16required under this Section shall be filed annually by all 17Supreme Court Judges on or before April 30. Statements also 18shall be filed by every person who becomes a Supreme Court 19Judge, within 45 days after assuming office. However, Supreme 20Court Judges who assume office on or after December 1 and who 21file the statement before the following April 30 shall not be 22required to file another statement until the next year.23    (d) Before the first Monday in March of each year, the 24Director of the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 25shall inform each Supreme Court Judge of the requirements of 26this Section and shall provide a copy of the Illinois Judicial   HB4069- 14 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1Statement of Economic Interests Form described in Section 25. 2The Director of the Administrative Office of the Illinois 3Courts shall do the same for each new Supreme Court Judge 4within 10 days of the Supreme Court Judge assuming office. 5    (e) The Clerk of the Illinois Supreme Court is authorized 6to redact any personal information that is not required to be 7disclosed in the statement. 8    (f) The Clerk of the Illinois Supreme Court shall maintain 9a publicly available list of all Supreme Court Judges and the 10last date on which each Supreme Court Judge filed the 11statement.12    (g) The Clerk of the Illinois Supreme Court shall send a 13Supreme Court Judge acknowledgment of receipt of the Supreme 14Court Judge's statement and the date of filing.15    (h) The Clerk of the Illinois Supreme Court shall post the 16contents of each statement filed with him or her and make the 17contents of the statement available for inspection and copying 18on a publicly accessible website. The postings under this 19subsection (h) shall not include the addresses or signatures 20of the filers. 21    Section 25. Illinois Judicial Statement of Economic 22Interests Form. The Illinois Judicial Statement of Economic 23Interests Form shall be substantially as follows:241. NAME OF FILING SUPREME COURT JUDGE:....................... 252. COURT AND DISTRICT/CIRCUIT:...............................   HB4069- 15 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b13. CURRENT ECONOMIC INTERESTS. 2    a. FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS. 3        i. List each financial institution in which any 4    covered person has assets valued in excess of $1,000, 5    including assets held in savings accounts, checking 6    accounts, money market accounts, certificates of deposits, 7    or retirement/investment accounts. 8        ii. Do not provide account numbers. Multiple accounts 9    at the same financial institution need not be separately 10    listed.  11Financial Institution12.13.14.15.16.17. 18Check if none .......... 19    b. STOCKS, BONDS, ETF, AND MUTUAL FUNDS. 20        i. List stocks, bonds, exchange traded funds (ETF), 21    and mutual funds valued in excess of $1,000 owned by a 22    covered person, including such assets held in a 23    retirement/investment account. 24        ii. Do not list (1) multiple holdings of the same   HB4069- 16 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1    security (e.g., multiple U.S. Treasury Notes), (2) 2    multiple securities issued by the same issuer, (3) 3    different mutual funds in the same mutual fund family, (4) 4    assets owned by a mutual fund or ETF, or (5) deposits or 5    proprietary interests held as a member of a mutual savings 6    association or credit union. 7Name of Issuer or Mutual Fund 8or ETF FamilyNature of Security (i.e., stock, bond, mutual fund, ETF)9..10..11..12..13..14..15..16.. 17Check if none .......... 18    c. REAL ESTATE. 19        i. List all real estate in which any covered person 20    has an ownership interest, including a beneficial interest 21    in a land trust. 22        ii. For each personal residence of a covered person or 23    a covered person's family member, state "personal 24    residence" and do not provide address.    HB4069- 17 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1Address (other than 2for a personal 3residence)45Type of Property (e.g., single-family residence, condominium, farmland, etc.)Income Received? (Yes/No)6...7...8...9... 10Check if none .......... 11    d. PENSION PLANS. List any nonjudicial pension plan in 12which any covered person has an interest. This does not 13include (1) Individual Retirement Accounts, 401(k) plans, 14403(b) plans, or 457 plans or (2) any benefits from the Social 15Security Administration. 16Plan Sponsor/AdministratorIncome Received? (Yes/No)17..18..19.. 20Check if none .......... 21    e. INTERESTS IN INTANGIBLE PROPERTY. List any interest 22valued in excess of $1,000 in intangible property, not   HB4069- 18 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1reported above, owned by any covered person. This includes, 2but is not limited to, an interest in any partnership, 3corporation, limited liability company, trust, copyright, 4trademark, or chose in action.  5Description of 6Intangible PropertyNature of InterestIncome Received? (Yes/No)7...8...9... 10Check if none .......... 11    f. EMPLOYMENT. List every paid employment of a covered 12person, with the exception of the filing Supreme Court Judge's 13judicial employment.  14Name of Employer15.16.17.18. 19Check if none .......... 20    g. NONINVESTMENT INCOME. List the nature of all 21noninvestment income, other than employment income, received 22by a covered person from any one source that totals at least   HB4069- 19 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1$1,000 in the 12-month period before the record date. Income 2includes, but is not limited to, fees, commissions, payments 3for personal services, and royalties. Do not include the 4amount.  5Source of Noninvestment IncomeNature of Noninvestment Income (Commission, Royalty, etc.)6..7..8..9..10..11.. 12Check if none .......... 134. INDEBTEDNESS. 14    a. List all creditors to whom amounts in excess of $1,000 15were owed by any covered person on the record date, and 16identify any sureties or guarantors of any such indebtedness. 17    b. Do not include any debt, including credit card debt, 18that was paid in its entirety within 90 days of when it was 19incurred. For these purposes, medical or dental expenses are 20not considered to be incurred until the amount of the covered 21person's financial responsibility is determined after the 22application of any insurance benefits. 23    c. The amount of each listed indebtedness shall be   HB4069- 20 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1reported by reference to a letter category, as follows: 2Category A ($1,000.01 - $5,000); Category B ($5,000.01 - 3$15,000); Category C ($15,000.01 - $50,000); Category D 4($50,000.01 - $100,000); Category E ($100,000.01 - $250,000); 5and Category F (greater than $250,000). This categorization 6shall be reported as of the record date.  7Name of Creditor8Valuation Category on Record DateIdentity of any Surety or Guarantor of the Indebtedness9...10...11...12...13...14...15... 16Check if none .......... 175. RELATIONSHIPS WITH LAWYERS. 18    a. Identify all persons, other than covered persons, known 19by the filing Supreme Court Judge to be licensed or registered 20to practice law who, at any time within the 12-month period 21before the record date, was a co-owner with a covered person of 22any economic interest, a co-obligor with or a creditor of a 23covered person, or the payor to a covered person of any income,   HB4069- 21 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1payments, or benefits, required to be disclosed in paragraphs 23 or 4. State the nature of each economic interest, 3indebtedness, or income, payments, or benefits and whether it 4is ongoing or terminated as of the record date. 5Name of Lawyer678Nature of Economic Interest, Indebtedness, or Income, Payments, or BenefitsOngoing or Terminated9...10...11... 12Check if none .......... 13    b. Identify all lawyers with whom the filing Supreme Court 14Judge was associated in the private practice of law within 3 15years of the date of this filing. The name of the firm may be 16substituted where the association was with 5 or more lawyers. 17Name of Lawyer or Law FirmAddress18..19..20..21.. 22Check if none ..........   HB4069- 22 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b16. BOARD SERVICE. List every office or directorship held by a 2covered person, regardless of whether compensation is 3received. Do not include any uncompensated or honorary 4positions in educational, religious, charitable, fraternal, 5civic, social, or law-related organizations unless those 6organizations are either conducted for profit or regularly 7engaged in adversary proceedings in any court. 8Name of OrganizationPosition HeldCompensation Received? (Yes/No)9...10...11...12... 13Check if none .......... 147. LITIGATION. 15    a. List all court cases or arbitration proceedings known 16to the filing Supreme Court Judge pending on or within 12 17months before the record date in which a covered person either 18was a party or had more than a de minimis financial interest 19(i.e., a monetary interest that could not raise a reasonable 20question as to the Supreme Court Judge's impartiality). Do not 21include (1) proceedings in which a covered person is a party 22solely in an official capacity, (2) class actions in which a   HB4069- 23 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1covered person is not a named class representative, or (3) 2motor vehicle offenses that are punishable by fine only. 3Case Name, Tribunal, and Case Number4.5.6. 7Check if none .......... 8    b. List all cases in which the filing Supreme Court Judge 9was a referring lawyer with an economic interest that are 10still pending on the record date or that were resolved within 3 11years before the record date. Include the name of the lawyer or 12law firm to which the case was referred. 13Case Name, Court 14Where Pending, and 15Case NumberIdentity of Lawyer or Law Firm to Which the Case Was ReferredPending Case? (Yes/No)16...17...18...19... 20Check if none .......... 218. FIDUCIARY POSITIONS. List all fiduciary positions held by   HB4069- 24 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1the filing Supreme Court Judge on the record date. Examples 2include service as a trustee, executor, estate administrator, 3guardian of the estate, or agent under a power of attorney for 4property. Do not include fiduciary positions held for the 5benefit of a family member of a covered person. Identify by 6name each person, other than a covered person, for whom the 7filing judge is serving as fiduciary. 8Fiduciary Position9Name of Person for Whom the Filing Supreme Court Judge Is Serving as Fiduciary10..11..12.. 13Check if none .......... 149. HONORARIA, REIMBURSEMENT OF EXPENSES, AND WAIVERS OF FEES. 15List all benefits that (a) either individually or in the 16aggregate from the same provider of the benefits exceed $500 17and (b) were received by a covered person, or a guest of the 18filing Supreme Court Judge in connection with an event at 19which the benefits were received, during the 12-month period 20prior to the record date. Do not report (a) waivers of fees to 21any unit of government or (b) reimbursement or payment of 22expenses, or provision of resources, by any unit of 23government. Identify the provider of each benefit, and state   HB4069- 25 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1the type of the recipient of each benefit (i.e., filing 2Supreme Court Judge, filing Supreme Court Judge's guest, 3spouse, domestic partner, or child) rather than the specific 4name. The value of each benefit shall be reported by reference 5to a letter category, as follows: Category A ($500 - $2,500); 6Category B ($2,500.01 - $5,000); and Category C (greater than 7$5,000).  8Identity of 9Provider of the 10BenefitDescription of the BenefitType of Recipient of the BenefitValue of the Benefit11....12....13....14.... 15Check if none .......... 1610. GIFTS. List all gifts that (a) either individually or in 17the aggregate from the same donor exceed $500 and (b) were 18received by a covered person during the 12-month period prior 19to the record date. Do not include gifts between covered 20persons or between covered persons and any of their 21great-grandparents, grandparents, parents, uncles, aunts, 22brothers, sisters, grandchildren, great-grandchildren, 23nephews, and nieces. Identify the provider of each gift, and 24state the type of the recipient of each gift (i.e., filing   HB4069- 26 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1Supreme Court Judge, spouse, domestic partner, or child) 2rather than the specific name. The value of each gift shall be 3reported by reference to a letter category, as follows: 4Category A ($500 - $2,500); Category B ($2,500.01 - $5,000); 5and Category C (greater than $5,000).  6Identity of 7Provider of the 8GiftDescription of the GiftType of Recipient of the Gift Value of the Gift9....10....11....12.... 13Check if none .......... 1411. ADDITIONAL DISCLOSURES. List any economic interest not 15previously disclosed in this statement that could create a 16basis for disqualification of the filing Supreme Court Judge 17under Section 5 or Illinois Supreme Court Rules. Identify the 18person whose economic interest could create a basis for 19disqualification, but if that person is a covered person state 20the type of that covered person (i.e., filing Supreme Court 21Judge, spouse, domestic partner, or child) rather than the 22specific name.   HB4069- 27 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1Type of Covered Person or 2Identity of Other Person with 3an Economic Interest That Could 4Create a Basis for 5DisqualificationNature of Economic Interest6..7..8..9.. 10Check if none .......... 11VERIFICATION12As required under Section 20 of the Supreme Court Ethics Act, I 13declare that this Statement of Economic Interests, including 14any accompanying schedules and statements, has been examined 15by me and to the best of my knowledge and belief is true, 16correct, and complete. 17.............................................................18(Signature of Filing Supreme Court Judge)                       19(Date) 20.............................................................21(Printed Name of Filing Supreme Court Judge) 22.............................................................  HB4069- 28 -LRB104 13961 JDS 26907 b1(Email Address of Filing Supreme Court Judge) 2    Section 30. Investigation of violation by Judicial Inquiry 3Board. The Judicial Inquiry Board may investigate any alleged 4violation of this Act. If after an investigation and upon 5determination by the Judicial Inquiry Board that there is a 6reasonable basis to publicly charge a Supreme Court Judge with 7a violation of this Act, the Judicial Inquiry Board may file 8and prosecute a complaint before the Illinois Courts 9Commission. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.